District of Columbia statutes.
42-1305

Residential disclosure requirements.

The residential real property disclosure statement approved by the Mayor shall contain the following:

(1)

A list of actually known defects or information concerning the following:

(A)

Water and sewer systems;

(B)

Insulation;

(C)

Structural systems, including roof, walls, floors, foundation, and basement;

(D)

Plumbing, electrical, heating, and air conditioning systems;

(E)

History of infestation by rodents or wood-boring insects, if any;

(F)

Appliances;

(G)

Alarm system and intercom system; and

(H)

Garage door opener and remote control; and

(I)

Fixtures; and

(2)

Any other information required by the Mayor to be published by rulemaking, provided that nothing in this chapter or in any rules shall be deemed to modify or amend § 42-1755(f) [repealed].

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 6, 46 DCR 2111

History

This section is referenced in § 42-1303.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 45-955.

Prior Codifications